New Jersey, session 222, A4949.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A taxpayer who is a volunteer first responder shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due under the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., in an amount equal to 50 percent of the child care expenses incurred by the taxpayer during a taxable year.  The value of the credit allowed pursuant to this section shall not exceed $5,000 per taxpayer per taxable year.  A taxpayer shall only be eligible to receive the credit allowed pursuant to this section if the taxpayer has worked a minimum of 150 hours during the taxable year, including any required training hours, in their official capacities as a volunteer first responder. b.    To claim the credit allowed pursuant to this section, the taxpayer shall attach documentation to any return which the taxpayer is required to file under N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., in a form and manner prescribed by the director, substantiating the taxpayers eligibility for the credit and child care expenses incurred by the taxpayer during the taxable year. c.     The order of priority of the application of the credit allowed pursuant to this section and any other credits allowed by law shall be as prescribed by the director.  The amount of the credit applied under this section against the tax imposed pursuant to N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. for a taxable year, together with other payments, credits, deductions, and adjustments allowed by law, shall not reduce a taxpayers tax liability to an amount lower than zero. d.    As used in this section: "Child care expenses" means the actual costs incurred by a taxpayer for the provision of child care services for a dependent of the taxpayer, including, but not limited to:  costs incurred for hiring a caregiver to provide in-home or out-of-home child care services; costs incurred for the provision of child care services at a licensed child care facility, including a day care center; and any costs associated with after school care and after school programs, nursery school, preschool, and day camps. "Volunteer first responder" means a volunteer firefighter or a volunteer member of a duly incorporated first aid, emergency, ambulance, or rescue squad association. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning on or after the January 1 next following the date of enactment.